Utah statutes.
34-41-106.   Employee not disabled.

An employee, volunteer, prospective employee, or prospective volunteer whose drug test results are verified or confirmed as positive in accordance with the provisions of this chapter shall not, by virtue of those results alone, be defined as disabled for purposes of:

(1)  Title 34A, Chapter 5, Utah Antidiscrimination Act; or

(2)  the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990, 42 U.S.C. 12101 through 12213.

